Texas statutes.
EDUCATION CODE

TITLE 3. HIGHER EDUCATION

SUBTITLE C. THE UNIVERSITY OF TEXAS SYSTEM

CHAPTER 74. OTHER MEDICAL, DENTAL, AND NURSING UNITS OF THE UNIVERSITY OF TEXAS SYSTEM

SUBCHAPTER A. THE UNIVERSITY OF TEXAS MEDICAL BRANCH AT GALVESTON

Sec. 74.001. COMPOSITION. The University of Texas Medical Branch at Galveston is composed of the following component institutions under the control and management of the Board of Regents of The University of Texas System:

(1) The University of Texas Medical School at Galveston, including:

(A) the Graduate School;

(B) the School of Allied Health Sciences; and

(C) the Marine Biomedical Institute;

(2) The University of Texas Hospitals at Galveston, including:

(A) John Sealy Hospital;

(B) Children's Hospital;

(C) Marvin L. Graves Hospital;

(D) Randall Pavilion;

(E) Moody State School for Cerebral Palsied Children;

(F) R. Waverly Smith Pavilion;

(G) Jennie Sealy Hospital;

(H) John W. McCullough Outpatient Clinic;

(I) Rebecca Sealy Outpatient Facility; and

(J) Rosa and Henry Ziegler Hospital; and

(3) other institutions that may be assigned to it from time to time.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3178, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971.

Sec. 74.003. LAND ACQUISITION. The board may acquire by donation or deed of gift, for the use and benefit of the medical branch, any and all properties contiguous or adjacent, or both, to the campus of the medical branch when the lands are deemed necessary for campus expansion.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3179, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971.

Sec. 74.004. CENTENNIAL SCHOLARS MATCHING FUND. (a) The Centennial Scholars Matching Fund is created at the medical branch to recognize the historic role the medical branch has played in contributing to medical research and scholarship and to encourage the further development of that role by enhancing the recruitment and retention of eminent medical scholars and researchers.

(b) The fund shall consist of gifts, grants, and donations from private sources, appropriations from the legislature, and income earned on money in the fund.

(c) The legislature may appropriate to the fund an amount not to exceed the amount of gifts, grants, and donations paid to the fund from private sources during the preceding biennium. The legislature shall not appropriate any state funds to the fund after the year 1992.

(d) Repealed by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1312, Sec. 99(6), eff. September 1, 2013.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 928, Sec. 1, eff. June 14, 1989.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1312 (S.B. 59), Sec. 99(6), eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 74.005. TREATMENT OF CERTAIN PATIENTS. (a) The medical branch may enter into one or more contracts with a county, public hospital, or hospital district to provide treatment to residents of the county or service area, including a contract to provide treatment to residents who are eligible for health care assistance under Chapter 61, Health and Safety Code.

(b) If a contract is entered into under this section, the liability of a county, public hospital, or hospital district under the contract shall take into consideration the actual costs of the medical branch in providing health care services pursuant to the contract, but in no event may the liability of a county, public hospital, or hospital district exceed the medical branch's costs.

(c) If a contract to provide treatment to an eligible resident of a county or service area is not entered into under this section, the medical branch must receive the approval of the appropriate county, public hospital, or hospital district before providing nonemergency health care services to the resident. If that approval is not received, the county, public hospital, or hospital district is not liable to the medical branch for any nonemergency care provided to the resident. If approval is received, the county, public hospital, or hospital district is liable to the medical branch under Subsection (d) for the services provided by the medical branch to the resident.

(d) The liability of a county, public hospital, or hospital district to the medical branch for the treatment of eligible residents of the county or service area by the medical branch may not exceed the responsibility of a county as provided for in Chapter 61, Health and Safety Code, unless agreed to by the county, public hospital, or hospital district in a contract to provide treatment to those residents that is entered into under this section.

(e) In this section, "eligible resident," "hospital district," "public hospital," and "service area" have the same meanings assigned those terms by Chapter 61, Health and Safety Code.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1410, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 74.006. SUFFICIENCY OF FUNDS. The medical branch shall take any reasonable administrative or management action necessary to achieve the mission and strategic plan of the medical branch within the total amount of funds received by the medical branch from all sources, including institutional and local funds and hospital and clinic fees.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1410, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 74.007. INCENTIVE RETIREMENT PLANS. (a) The medical branch may offer incentive retirement plans to employees of the medical branch who elect to retire under other state law.

(b) An incentive offered to an employee by the medical branch must be paid from the medical branch's funds or hospital or clinic fees.

(c) The medical branch may not rehire an employee receiving a retirement incentive under this section without the specific approval of the president.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1410, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 74.008. ACQUISITION OF GOODS OR SERVICES. (a) The medical branch may acquire goods or services by the method that provides the best value to the medical branch, including:

(1) competitive bidding;

(2) competitive sealed proposals;

(3) catalogue purchase;

(4) a group purchasing program; or

(5) an open market contract.

(b) In determining what is the best value to the medical branch, the medical branch shall consider:

(1) the purchase price;

(2) the reputation of the vendor and of the vendor's goods or services;

(3) the quality of the vendor's goods or services;

(4) the extent to which the goods or services meet the medical branch's needs;

(5) the vendor's past relationship with the medical branch;

(6) the impact on the ability of the medical branch to comply with laws and rules relating to historically underutilized businesses;

(7) the total long-term cost to the medical branch of acquiring the vendor's goods or services; and

(8) any other relevant factor that a private business entity would consider in selecting a vendor.

(c) The state auditor may audit purchases of goods or services by the medical branch.

(d) The medical branch may adopt rules and procedures for the acquisition of goods or services.

(e) To the extent of any conflict, this section prevails over any other law relating to the purchasing of goods or services except a law relating to contracting with historically underutilized businesses or relating to the procurement of goods and services from persons with disabilities.

(f) This section does not apply to purchases of professional services subject to Chapter 2254, Government Code.

(g) Except as otherwise provided by this section, Subtitle D, Title 10, Government Code, does not apply to purchases of goods and services made under this section.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1410, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

SUBCHAPTER C. THE UNIVERSITY OF TEXAS SOUTHWESTERN MEDICAL CENTER

Sec. 74.101. COMPONENT INSTITUTION. The University of Texas Southwestern Medical Center is a component institution of The University of Texas System under the management and control of the board of regents of The University of Texas System.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3182, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971. Amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 644, Sec. 9, eff. June 14, 1989.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 179 (H.B. 1844), Sec. 11, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 74.102. COURSES AND DEGREES; RULES AND REGULATIONS. The board of regents may prescribe courses leading to customary degrees and may make rules and regulations for the operation, control, and management of the medical school as may be necessary for its conduct as a medical school of the first class.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3182, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971.

Sec. 74.103. GIFTS AND GRANTS. The board may accept and administer, on terms and conditions satisfactory to it, grants and gifts tendered to it in aid of research and teaching at the medical school. The board may also accept from the federal government or any foundation, trust fund, corporation, or individual donations, gifts, and grants, including real estate, buildings, libraries, laboratories, apparatus, equipment, records, and leases, for the exclusive use and benefit of the medical school.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3182, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 118, Sec. 3.01, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 74.104. ENTERING CLASSES. The medical school shall admit at least 100 students in each entering class.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3182, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971.

Sec. 74.105. LEASE OF LAND FOR HOSPITAL, ETC. (a) The board may lease to nonprofit charitable, scientific, or educational corporations organized under the laws of the State of Texas, or to any governmental agency or agencies, a tract or tracts of land situated in Dallas County out of land previously deeded by Southwestern Medical Foundation to the State of Texas.

(b) A lease under this section shall be on the terms, conditions, and provisions and for a period of years determined by the board. No lease shall be for a term of more than 99 years.

(c) A lease under this section shall be made only to a nonprofit corporation or governmental agency for the purpose of constructing, maintaining, and operating a hospital, hospitals, or public health centers and services; or for the purpose of constructing, maintaining, and operating dormitories and housing facilities for students attending the medical school or persons employed by and in institutions located on the property.

(d) In no event shall the State of Texas or The University of Texas System be liable, directly or indirectly, for any expense or cost in connection with the construction, operation, and maintenance of any building or other improvement placed on the leased premises by any lessee.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3182, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971.

SUBCHAPTER D. THE UNIVERSITY OF TEXAS MEDICAL SCHOOL AT SAN ANTONIO

Sec. 74.151. COMPONENT INSTITUTION. The University of Texas Medical School at San Antonio is a component institution of The University of Texas System under the management and control of the board of regents of The University of Texas System.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3183, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971.

Sec. 74.152. COURSES AND DEGREES; RULES AND REGULATIONS. The board of regents may prescribe courses leading to customary degrees and may make rules and regulations for the operation, control, and management of the medical school as may be necessary for its conduct as a medical school of the first class.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3183, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971.

Sec. 74.153. GIFTS AND GRANTS. The board may accept and administer, on terms and conditions satisfactory to it, grants and gifts tendered to it in aid of research and teaching at the medical school. The board may also accept from the federal government, any foundation, trust fund, corporation, or individual donations, gifts, and grants, including real estate, buildings, libraries, laboratories, apparatus, equipment, records, and money, for the exclusive use and benefit of the medical school.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3183, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 118, Sec. 3.02, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 74.154. TEACHING HOSPITAL. A teaching hospital deemed suitable by the board shall be provided by the city or county within one mile of the campus of the medical school. It shall be maintained without cost to the state.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3183, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971.

Sec. 74.155. NATIONAL CENTER FOR WARRIOR RESILIENCY. (a) In this section:

(1) "Board" means the board of regents of The University of Texas System.

(2) "Center" means the National Center for Warrior Resiliency.

(b) The board may establish the National Center for Warrior Resiliency at The University of Texas Health Science Center at San Antonio for purposes of:

(1) researching issues relating to the detection, prevention, diagnosis, and treatment of combat-related post-traumatic stress disorder and comorbid conditions; and

(2) providing clinical care to enhance the psychological resiliency of military personnel and veterans.

(c) The board may solicit, accept, and administer gifts and grants from any public or private source for the use and benefit of the center.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 512 (S.B. 27), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2017.

SUBCHAPTER E. MEDICAL SCHOOL TO BE ESTABLISHED AND LOCATED BY BOARD OF REGENTS

Sec. 74.201. ESTABLISHMENT AND LOCATION; NAME; SCOPE. (a) The board of regents may establish and maintain an additional medical branch of the university system at any location in the state. However, the location of the medical school must be determined by the board to be in the best interests of the people of the State of Texas and must be approved by the Coordinating Board, Texas College and University System. The school so established shall be known by a name designated by the board. The board is prohibited, however, from establishing this medical school in the same county that maintains or operates the main campus of any public or private medical school on September 1, 1969.

(b) The board may provide for the teaching and training of medical students, medical technicians, and other technicians in the practice of medicine.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3184, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971.

Sec. 74.202. COURSES AND DEGREES; RULES AND REGULATIONS. The board may prescribe courses leading to customary degrees offered in other leading American medical schools, may award the degrees, and may make other rules and regulations for the operation, control, and management of the school, including the determination of the number of students that shall be admitted to any degree-granting program, that are necessary for the conduct of a professional school of the first class.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3184, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971.

Sec. 74.203. AFFILIATION AGREEMENTS; JOINT APPOINTMENTS. The board may execute and carry out with any entity or institution affiliation or coordinating agreements that are reasonably necessary or desirable for the conduct and operation of a professional school of the first class; and the board may make joint appointments in other institutions under its governance. The salary of any person who receives a joint appointment shall be apportioned to the appointing institutions on the basis of services rendered.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3184, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971.

Sec. 74.204. GIFTS AND GRANTS. The board may accept and administer, on terms and conditions satisfactory to it, grants or gifts of property, including real estate and money, that may be tendered to it in aid of the planning, establishment, conduct, and operation of the school and in aid of research and teaching at the school. The board may accept from the federal government or any foundation, trust fund, corporation, or individual donations, gifts, and grants, including real estate, buildings, libraries, laboratories, apparatus, equipment, records, or money, for the use and benefit of the school.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3184, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971.

Sec. 74.205. TEACHING HOSPITAL. A complete teaching hospital for the school shall be furnished at no cost or expense to the state, and the state shall never contribute any funds for the construction, maintenance, or operation of a teaching hospital for the school.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3184, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971.

SUBCHAPTER F. THE UNIVERSITY OF TEXAS DENTAL SCHOOL AT SAN ANTONIO

Sec. 74.251. COMPONENT INSTITUTION. The University of Texas Dental School at San Antonio is a component institution of The University of Texas System under the management and control of the board of regents of The University of Texas System.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3185, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971.

Sec. 74.252. TRAINING AND TEACHING. The board may provide for the training and teaching of dental students, dental technicians, and other technicians related to the practice of dentistry.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3185, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971.

Sec. 74.253. COURSES AND DEGREES; RULES AND REGULATIONS. The board may prescribe courses leading to customary degrees offered in other leading American dental schools, may award the degrees, and may make other rules and regulations for the operation, control, and management of the school, including the determination of the number of students that shall be admitted to any degree-granting program, as may be necessary for the conduct of a professional school of the first class.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3185, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971.

Sec. 74.254. AFFILIATION AGREEMENTS; JOINT APPOINTMENTS. The board may execute and carry out with any entity or institution affiliation or coordinating agreements that are reasonably necessary or desirable for the conduct and operation of a professional school of the first class; and the board may make joint appointments in other institutions under its governance. The salary of a person who receives a joint appointment shall be apportioned to the appointing institutions on the basis of services rendered.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3185, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971.

Sec. 74.255. GIFTS AND GRANTS. The board may accept gifts and grants from any source for the benefit of the dental school.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3185, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971.

SUBCHAPTER G. THE UNIVERSITY OF TEXAS (CLINICAL) NURSING SCHOOL AT SAN ANTONIO

Sec. 74.301. ESTABLISHMENT; PURPOSE. The board of regents may establish and maintain in Bexar County The University of Texas (Clinical) Nursing School at San Antonio, a clinical nursing school for the education of nursing students.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3185, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971.

Sec. 74.302. HOSPITAL FACILITIES AND SERVICES. All hospital facilities and services required for the operation and maintenance of the nursing school shall be furnished and provided at no cost or expense to the state at the time of completion of the nursing school and subsequently.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3186, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971.

Sec. 74.303. COURSES AND DEGREES; RULES AND REGULATIONS. The board may prescribe courses leading to customary degrees offered in other leading American nursing schools, may award those degrees, and may make rules and regulations for the operation, control, and management of the school as may be necessary for the conduct of a professional school of the first class.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3186, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971.

Sec. 74.304. AFFILIATION AGREEMENTS; JOINT APPOINTMENTS. The board may execute and carry out with any entity or institution affiliation or coordinating agreements that are reasonably necessary or desirable for the conduct and operation of a professional school of the first class, not in conflict with Section 74.302 of this code; and the board may make joint appointments in other institutions under its governance. The salary of any person who receives a joint appointment shall be apportioned to the appointing institutions on the basis of services rendered.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3186, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971.

Sec. 74.305. GIFTS AND GRANTS. The board may accept and administer, on terms and conditions satisfactory to it, grants and gifts of property, including real estate and money, that may be tendered to it in aid of the planning, establishment, conduct, and operation of the school and in aid of research and teaching at the school. The board may accept from the federal government or any foundation, trust fund, corporation, or individual donations, gifts, and grants, including real estate, buildings, libraries, laboratories, apparatus, equipment, records and money, for the use and benefit of the school.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3186, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971.

Sec. 74.306. LIBERAL ARTS COURSES PENDING ESTABLISHMENT. While the nursing school is being established, students may take the prerequisite liberal arts courses prescribed by the nursing school.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3186, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971.

SUBCHAPTER H. THE UNIVERSITY OF TEXAS (UNDERGRADUATE) NURSING SCHOOL AT EL PASO

Sec. 74.351. ESTABLISHMENT; PURPOSE. The board of regents may establish and maintain in El Paso County The University of Texas (Undergraduate) Nursing School at El Paso, a four-year school for the education of nursing students.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3186, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971.

Sec. 74.352. HOSPITAL FACILITIES AND SERVICES. All hospital facilities and services required for the operation and maintenance of the nursing school shall be furnished and provided at no cost or expense to the state at the time of completion of the nursing school and subsequently.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3187, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971.

Sec. 74.353. COURSES AND DEGREES; RULES AND REGULATIONS. The board may prescribe courses leading to customary degrees offered in other leading American nursing schools, may award those degrees, and may make rules and regulations for the operation, control, and management of the school as may be necessary for the conduct of a professional school of the first class.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3187, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971.

Sec. 74.354. AFFILIATION AGREEMENTS; JOINT APPOINTMENTS. The board may execute and carry out with any entity or institution affiliation or coordinating agreements that are reasonably necessary or desirable for the conduct and operation of a professional school of the first class, not in conflict with Section 74.352 of this code; and the board may make joint appointments in other institutions under its governance. The salary of any person who receives a joint appointment shall be apportioned to the appointing institution on the basis of services rendered.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3187, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971.

Sec. 74.355. GIFTS AND GRANTS. The board may accept and administer, on terms and conditions satisfactory to it, grants and gifts of property, including real estate and money, that may be tendered to it in aid of the planning, establishment, conduct and operation of the school and in aid of research and teaching at the school. The board may accept from the federal government or any foundation, trust fund, corporation, or individual donations, gifts, and grants, including real estate, buildings, libraries, laboratories, apparatus, equipment, records and money, for the use and benefit of the school.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3187, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971.

SUBCHAPTER I. THE UNIVERSITY OF TEXAS NURSING SCHOOL (SYSTEM-WIDE)

Sec. 74.401. COMPOSITION, OPERATION, MAINTENANCE. The board of regents of The University of Texas System is authorized to establish, maintain, and operate The University of Texas Nursing School (System-wide) which is composed of the following branches: The University of Texas (Undergraduate) Nursing School at Austin; The University of Texas (Graduate) Nursing School at Austin; The University of Texas (Undergraduate) Nursing School at El Paso; The University of Texas (Clinical) Nursing School at Galveston; The University of Texas (Clinical) Nursing School at San Antonio; and The University of Texas (Undergraduate) Nursing School at Tarrant County. The board is authorized to provide for the education of nursing students at each nursing school; however, all hospital facilities and services required for the operation and maintenance of each nursing school shall be furnished and provided at no cost and expense to the State of Texas except at the Galveston Division of The University of Texas (Clinical) Nursing School at Galveston.

Added by Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3346, ch. 1024, art. 2, Sec. 19, eff. Sept. 1, 1971.

Sec. 74.402. COURSES, DEGREES, ETC. The board is authorized to prescribe courses leading to such customary degrees as are offered in other leading American nursing schools, to award those degrees, and to make rules and regulations for the operation, control, and management of each nursing school, as may be necessary for the conduct of professional schools of the first class.

Added by Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3346, ch. 1024, art. 2, Sec. 19, eff. Sept. 1, 1971.

Sec. 74.403. AFFILIATION AGREEMENTS; JOINT APPOINTMENTS. The board is authorized to execute and carry out with any entity or institution affiliation or coordinating agreements that are reasonably necessary or desirable for the conduct and operation of professional schools of the first class, not in conflict with Section 74.401 of this code, and the board is specifically authorized to make joint appointments in other institutions under its governance, the salary of any such person who receives a joint appointment to be apportioned to the appointing institutions on the basis of services rendered.

Added by Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3346, ch. 1024, art. 2, Sec. 19, eff. Sept. 1, 1971.

Sec. 74.404. GIFTS AND GRANTS. The board may accept gifts and grants from any source in aid of the conduct and operation of The University of Texas Nursing School (System-wide) or the branch nursing schools.

Added by Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3346, ch. 1024, art. 2, Sec. 19, eff. Sept. 1, 1971.

SUBCHAPTER J. PODIATRY SCHOOL TO BE ESTABLISHED AND LOCATED

Sec. 74.501. ESTABLISHMENT AND LOCATION; NAME; SCOPE. (a) Subject to the approval of the Coordinating Board, Texas College and University System, the board of regents of the University of Texas System may establish and maintain a podiatry branch of its system at any location in the state. The location of the podiatry school must be determined by the board of regents to be in the best interests of the people of the State of Texas and must be approved by the Coordinating Board, Texas College and University System. If possible, the podiatry school shall be located in or affiliated with an existing or proposed academic health sciences center which provides education and training of medical students, dental students, or both, or shall be located in or affiliated with a medical or dental unit, as such term is defined in paragraph (5), Section 61.003, of this Code. If it is not possible to so locate or affiliate the podiatry school, it may be located in or affiliated with any other public senior college or university within the system under the jurisdiction of the board of regents. The school so established shall be known by a name designated by the board of regents.

(b) The board of regents may provide for the teaching and training of podiatry students, podiatry technicians, and other technicians in the practice of podiatry.

Added by Acts 1973, 63rd Leg., p. 1681, ch. 608, Sec. 1, eff. June 15, 1973.

Sec. 74.502. COURSES AND DEGREES; RULES AND REGULATIONS. The board may prescribe courses leading to customary degrees offered in other leading American podiatry schools, may award the degrees, and may make other rules and regulations for the operation, control, and management of the school, including the determination of the numbers of students that shall be admitted to any degree-granting programs, that are necessary for the conduct of a professional school of the first class.

Added by Acts 1973, 63rd Leg., p. 1681, ch. 608, Sec. 1, eff. June 15, 1973.

Sec. 74.503. AFFILIATION AGREEMENTS; JOINT APPOINTMENTS. The board may execute and carry out with any entity or institution affiliation or coordinating agreements that are reasonably necessary or desirable for the conduct and operation of a professional school of the first class; and the board may make joint appointments in other institutions under its governance. The salary of any person who receives a joint appointment shall be apportioned to the appointing institutions on the basis of services rendered.

Added by Acts 1973, 63rd Leg., p. 1681, ch. 608, Sec. 1, eff. June 15, 1973.

Sec. 74.504. GIFTS AND GRANTS. The board may accept and administer on terms and conditions satisfactory to it, grants or gifts of property, including real estate and money, that may be tendered to it in aid of research and teaching at the school. The board may accept from the federal government or any foundation, trust fund, corporation, individual, or other legal entity, donations, gifts, and grants, including real estate, buildings, libraries, laboratories, apparatus, equipment, records, or money, for the use and benefit of the school.

Added by Acts 1973, 63rd Leg., p. 1681, ch. 608, Sec. 1, eff. June 15, 1973.

Sec. 74.505. TEACHING HOSPITAL. A teaching hospital shall be furnished for or available for use by the school at no cost or expense to the state, and the state shall never contribute any funds for the construction, maintenance, or operation of a teaching hospital for the school.

Added by Acts 1973, 63rd Leg., p. 1681, ch. 608, Sec. 1, eff. June 15, 1973.

Sec. 74.506. FUNDING. No state funds shall be expended for physical improvements for the purpose of this Act before fiscal year 1977.

Added by Acts 1973, 63rd Leg., p. 1681, ch. 608, Sec. 1, eff. June 15, 1973.

SUBCHAPTER K. THE UNIVERSITY OF TEXAS HEALTH SCIENCE CENTER AT TYLER

Sec. 74.601. USE AND CONTROL. (a) The Board of Regents of The University of Texas System shall govern, operate, manage, and control The University of Texas Health Science Center at Tyler and the land, buildings, facilities, equipment, supplies, improvements, and other property comprising the center in the manner authorized by law for the governance, management, and control of other component institutions of The University of Texas System.

(b) The board of regents may use the center as a teaching hospital.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 678, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 74.602. PURPOSES OF HEALTH SCIENCE CENTER; DEGREE PROGRAMS. (a) It is the policy of this state to provide a program of treatment of the citizens of this state who are affected with respiratory diseases. In pursuance of that policy, The University of Texas Health Science Center at Tyler, among other functions, shall serve as the primary facility in this state to:

(1) conduct research relating to respiratory diseases;

(2) develop diagnostic and treatment techniques and procedures for respiratory diseases;

(3) provide training and teaching programs; and

(4) provide diagnosis and treatment of inpatients and outpatients with respiratory diseases.

(b) The center may provide education and training in allied health and related health science fields, and for that purpose may prescribe courses and conduct professional or other degree programs in those fields. The center may prescribe a course or conduct a degree program under this subsection jointly or in collaboration with any other appropriate educational entity or institution.

(c) The degree programs to be offered under Subsection (b) are subject to approval by the Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 678, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 266 (S.B. 276), Sec. 1, eff. June 1, 2005.

Sec. 74.603. SERVICE AS STATE CHEST HOSPITAL. (a) The University of Texas Health Science Center at Tyler serves as a state chest hospital under Subchapter B, Chapter 13, Health and Safety Code, among other functions, for tuberculosis patients sent by the Texas Department of Health.

(b) Sections 13.034 and 13.044, Health and Safety Code, do not apply to the center.

(c) It is the intent of the legislature that:

(1) The University of Texas System shall provide and pay for the care and treatment of tuberculosis patients in The University of Texas Health Science Center at Tyler from funds appropriated to the center for that purpose;

(2) The University of Texas System shall honor and perform all contracts in existence on September 1, 1977, entered into by, for, or on behalf of the center, including contracts related to the training and education of osteopathic resident physicians at the center; and

(3) if additional contracts are required to provide for the care and treatment of outpatients, The University of Texas System shall, as appropriate:

(A) pay for the care and treatment from funds appropriated for that purpose; or

(B) transfer to the Texas Department of Health, out of funds appropriated to the center for that purpose, money to pay for the care and treatment.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 678, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 74.604. EAST TEXAS CENTER FOR RURAL GERIATRIC STUDIES. (a) In this section:

(1) "Board" means the board of regents of The University of Texas System.

(2) "Center" means the East Texas Center for Rural Geriatric Studies.

(b) The board may establish the East Texas Center for Rural Geriatric Studies at The University of Texas Health Science Center at Tyler for purposes of:

(1) researching issues in geriatrics, gerontology, and long-term care for the elderly, with an emphasis on the elderly living in rural and nonmetropolitan areas; and

(2) providing related resources in East Texas and other rural areas in this state for training and research for:

(A) professionals in medicine, including psychiatry, and in nursing, pharmacy, and allied health fields who provide health care to the elderly;

(B) caregivers and advocates for the elderly; and

(C) individuals employed by agencies that provide services to the elderly.

(c) The organization, control, and oversight of the center are vested in the board.

(d) If the board establishes the center, the board shall:

(1) provide for the employment of staff and an operating budget for the center; and

(2) select a site for the center at The University of Texas Health Science Center at Tyler.

(e) The center may solicit, accept, and administer gifts and grants from any public or private source for the use and benefit of the center.

(f) Establishment of the center is subject to the availability of federal funding, gifts, grants, or other funding for that purpose.

(g) An employee of the center is an employee of The University of Texas System.

(h) The center may enter into an agreement with a public or private entity to operate or participate in the operation of the center.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1243, Sec. 1, eff. June 20, 2003.

SUBCHAPTER L. LOWER RIO GRANDE VALLEY ACADEMIC HEALTH CENTER

Sec. 74.611. AUTHORITY TO ESTABLISH OR PARTICIPATE IN CENTER. (a) The board of regents of The University of Texas System may establish a regional academic health center serving Cameron, Hidalgo, Starr, and Willacy counties, and may include any medical institutions for participation in the program in the aforementioned counties, if general revenue funds are specifically appropriated by the legislature for that purpose. The center may consist of facilities located throughout the region. The board may execute and carry out affiliation or coordination agreements with any other entity or institution in the region to establish or to participate in the establishment or operation of the center, which includes all traditional and all other providers of health services to the counties listed in this subsection.

(b) The board of regents may assign responsibility for the management of the regional academic health center to any component institution or institutions of The University of Texas System. The operating costs of the regional academic health center shall be paid from operating funds of the component institution and from available funds of any other public or private entity.

(c) The regional academic health center may be used to provide undergraduate clinical education, graduate education, including residency training programs, or other levels of medical education work in the counties identified in Subsection (a) in connection with any component institution or institutions of The University of Texas System as the board of regents determines appropriate.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 672, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 74.612. GIFTS AND GRANTS. The board of regents may accept and administer gifts and grants from any public or private person or entity for the use and benefit of the regional academic health center.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 672, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 74.613. FACILITIES. The physical facilities of the regional academic health center used in its teaching and research programs, including libraries, auditoriums, research facilities, and medical education buildings, may be provided by a public or private entity. A physical facility may be constructed, maintained, or operated with state money appropriated for that purpose.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 672, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 74.614. TEACHING HOSPITAL. A teaching hospital considered suitable by the board of regents may be provided by a public or private entity. The hospital may not be constructed, maintained, or operated with state funds.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 672, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 74.615. COORDINATING BOARD SUPERVISION. The regional academic health center is subject to the continuing supervision of the Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board under Chapter 61 and to the rules of the coordinating board adopted under Chapter 61.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 672, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

SUBCHAPTER M. UNIVERSITY OF TEXAS SYSTEM MULTI-INSTITUTION CENTER IN LAREDO

Sec. 74.701. AUTHORITY TO ESTABLISH CENTER. The board of regents of The University of Texas System shall establish and operate a multi-institution center in the city of Laredo if:

(1) a public or private entity offers the board of regents sufficient land in that city to construct a center; and

(2) public or private entities agree to provide funds necessary to construct an administrative building for the center.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1270, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 156 (S.B. 884), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 74.702. MANAGEMENT AND OPERATION OF CENTER. (a) The board of regents may exercise any power granted to the board under Subchapter D in establishing and operating the center.

(b) The board of regents may assign responsibility for management of the center to a component institution of the system.

(c) The operating costs of the center shall be paid from available funds from any public or private entity.

(d) The primary purpose of the center is to host educational activities, conduct and facilitate research, and engage in community outreach. Component institutions of the system may use the center in accordance with its primary purpose to provide undergraduate and graduate medical and dental education, including residency training programs, and other levels of health education work in collaboration with any public institution of higher education considered appropriate by the board of regents.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1270, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 156 (S.B. 884), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 74.703. GIFTS AND GRANTS. The board of regents may accept and administer gifts and grants from any public or private person or entity for the use and benefit of the center, including accepting and administering gifts and grants of land and physical facilities.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1270, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 156 (S.B. 884), Sec. 4, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 74.704. FACILITIES. (a) The physical facilities of the center used in teaching and research programs, including libraries, auditoriums, research facilities, and health education buildings, may be provided by a public or private entity. The board of regents may lease the facilities that are to be used as the physical facilities of the center.

(b) A teaching hospital considered suitable by the board of regents may be provided by a public or private entity. The hospital may not be constructed, maintained, or operated with state funds.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1270, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 156 (S.B. 884), Sec. 5, eff. September 1, 2021.

SUBCHAPTER N. THE UNIVERSITY OF TEXAS HEALTH

SCIENCE CENTER--SOUTH TEXAS

Sec. 74.751. HEALTH SCIENCE CENTER. (a) The board of regents of The University of Texas System may operate The University of Texas Health Science Center--South Texas as provided by Section 79.02, with its administrative offices to be located in Hidalgo and Cameron Counties. The health science center shall consist of a medical school, as provided by Section 74.752, other health and health-related degree programs, and related programs and facilities as the board considers appropriate.

(b) The board of regents may include facilities located in Bee, Brooks, Cameron, Hidalgo, Jim Hogg, Jim Wells, Kenedy, Kleberg, Nueces, Starr, Willacy, and Zapata Counties in the health science center and may operate programs and activities and provide related services of the center in those counties.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1341 (S.B. 98), Sec. 1, eff. June 19, 2009.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 726 (S.B. 24), Sec. 2, eff. June 14, 2013.

Sec. 74.752. MEDICAL SCHOOL. The medical school established as a component of the health science center and as a component institution of The University of Texas System under the management and control of the board of regents of The University of Texas System is subject to this section. The offices overseeing undergraduate medical education shall be located in Hidalgo County and the offices overseeing graduate medical education shall be located in Cameron County. The board shall ensure that educational programs for first-year and second-year students shall be primarily located in Hidalgo County, and the educational programs for third-year and fourth-year students shall be primarily located in Cameron County; and the educational programs for all medical students shall take full advantage of the existing educational facilities and programs at The University of Texas--Pan American's Edinburg campus or successor campus, The University of Texas at Brownsville campus or successor campus, and the Lower Rio Grande Valley Academic Health Center established under Subchapter L, Chapter 74, in Harlingen and Edinburg. Graduate medical education programs and activities shall be conducted throughout the region.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1341 (S.B. 98), Sec. 1, eff. June 19, 2009.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 726 (S.B. 24), Sec. 3, eff. June 14, 2013.

Sec. 74.753. PARTICIPATION IN AVAILABLE UNIVERSITY FUND. In accordance with Section 18(c), Article VII, Texas Constitution, if the Act enacting this section receives a vote of two-thirds of all the members elected to each house of the legislature, and if an institution is established under this subchapter, the institution is entitled to participate in the funding provided by Section 18, Article VII, Texas Constitution, for The University of Texas System.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1341 (S.B. 98), Sec. 1, eff. June 19, 2009.

Sec. 74.754. COURSES AND DEGREES; RULES. The board of regents may prescribe courses leading to customary degrees and may adopt rules for the operation, control, and management of the health science center as may be necessary for the conduct of a medical school and other health science center programs of the first class.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1341 (S.B. 98), Sec. 1, eff. June 19, 2009.

Sec. 74.755. AFFILIATION AGREEMENTS; JOINT APPOINTMENTS. (a) The board of regents may execute and carry out affiliation or coordination agreements with any other entity or institution in the region.

(b) The board of regents may make joint appointments in the health science center, its component institutions, and other institutions under the board's governance. The salary of a person who receives a joint appointment shall be apportioned to the appointing institutions on the basis of services rendered.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1341 (S.B. 98), Sec. 1, eff. June 19, 2009.

Sec. 74.756. GIFTS AND GRANTS; OTHER FUNDING. (a) The board of regents may accept and administer gifts and grants from any public or private person or entity for the use and benefit of the health science center and its component institutions.

(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of this subchapter, establishment of the health science center is subject to the availability of funding, either through appropriation or from another source.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1341 (S.B. 98), Sec. 1, eff. June 19, 2009.

Sec. 74.757. OTHER FACILITIES. In addition to the facilities of the health science center and its component institutions, the board of regents may enter into agreements under which additional facilities used in the center's teaching and research programs, including libraries, auditoriums, research facilities, and medical education buildings, may be provided by a public or private entity.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1341 (S.B. 98), Sec. 1, eff. June 19, 2009.

Sec. 74.758. TEACHING HOSPITAL. A teaching hospital considered suitable by the board of regents for the health science center may be provided by a public or private entity. The hospital may not be constructed, maintained, or operated with state funds.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1341 (S.B. 98), Sec. 1, eff. June 19, 2009.

Sec. 74.759. COORDINATING BOARD SUPERVISION. The health science center is subject to the continuing supervision of the Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board under Chapter 61 and to the rules of the coordinating board adopted under Chapter 61.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1341 (S.B. 98), Sec. 1, eff. June 19, 2009.

Sec. 74.760. EFFECT OF HEALTH SCIENCE CENTER ON LOWER RIO GRANDE VALLEY ACADEMIC HEALTH CENTER. (a) The board of regents may convert the regional academic health center established under Subchapter L into The University of Texas Health Science Center--South Texas and may establish The University of Texas Medical School--South Texas at the health science center as soon as the board considers appropriate considering available resources and the best interests of The University of Texas System and the people of this state and the South Texas region. In establishing the health science center and medical school, the board of regents shall ensure that the programs, students, and faculty and staff of the regional academic health center are not affected other than as the board considers necessary to implement this subchapter.

(b) It is the intent of the legislature that The University of Texas Health Science Center--South Texas and its component institutions be established by conversion of the regional academic health center established under Subchapter L and that those entities be considered to be the same institution. A reference in law to the regional academic health center applies to The University of Texas Health Science Center--South Texas to the extent it can be made applicable. All contracts and agreements, including bonds and other financial obligations, entered into by The University of Texas System or any of its officers or employees relating to the regional academic health center apply to The University of Texas Health Science Center--South Texas when the health science center is established.

(c) The permanent endowment fund established under Section 63.101 for the benefit of the regional academic health center established under Subchapter L is transferred to the benefit of The University of Texas Health Science Center--South Texas and its component institutions when the health science center is established. It is the intent of the legislature that the transfer of the permanent endowment fund be made so as not to interrupt the research or other programs supported by distributions from the fund.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1341 (S.B. 98), Sec. 1, eff. June 19, 2009.